src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# South Saami verbal inflection sublexica

This is the file for the South Saami verb inflection and derivation.

## The auxiliaries

First we just list the auxiliaries and their inflection.

* **LEXICON LEA** the copula

    - **LEXICON LEA-PRES**

    - **LEXICON LEA-PRET**

    - **LEXICON LEA-IMP**

### The negative verb

* **LEXICON NEG**

    - **LEXICON OLLE**

    - **LEXICON NEGIMP**

    - **LEXICON IJ-PRES**

### Other auxiliaries

* **LEXICON EDTJEDH**

    - **LEXICON ED-PRES**

    - **LEXICON ED-PRET**

    - **LEXICON ED-IMP**

## Odd-syllable verbs

Odd syllable verbs differ in Prt Sg3.
This form is treated separately, and
the rest of the paradigm is conflated.

* **LEXICON TJOEVERIDH_IV**

* **LEXICON GOLTELIDH_TV**

* **LEXICON AALHTEDIDH_TV**

* **LEXICON AALHTEDIDH_IV**

* **LEXICON GOLTELIDH_IV**

* **LEXICON GOLTELIDH**, odd-syll with -adte- as Der2

* **LEXICON BALVEDIDH**

* **LEXICON RIHPESIDH**,  -nidh and -sidh

* **LEXICON AAJVESTIDH_TV**, for stems ending -t-: dåajvoeht-, odd-syll with -alle- as Der2 and passive -sovvedh

* **LEXICON DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV**

* **LEXICON DÅAJVOEHTIDH_IV**

* **LEXICON DÅAJVOEHTIDH** for stems ending -t-: dåajvoeht-, odd-syll with -alle- as Der2

### Inflection common to all odd verbs

* **LEXICON COMMON-ODD**

* Finite forms

* Infinite forms

* Derivations

## Even-syllable verbs

* **LEXICON MAEHTEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON BÅETEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON BÅETEDH_TV_ePRET**

* **LEXICON BÅETEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON BÅETEDH_IV_ePRET**

* **LEXICON BÅETEDH** row A - Group I

* **LEXICON BÅETEDH_NOTVGEN** row A - Group Ixxf

* **LEXICON SEVTEDH** row A - Group I  IMPERSONALS!

* **LEXICON ÅEREDH** row A - Group I   Hasselbrink: "öörim."- (Thomassen) Qvigstad: "vöörtim" 

* **LEXICON ÅEREDH_TV** row A - Group I   NO -øø-UMLAUT!!!!

* **LEXICON TJEARODH_TV**

* **LEXICON TJEARODH_IV**

* **LEXICON TJEARODH** row C - Group II

* **LEXICON ABRODH** row C - Group II

* **LEXICON TSEAHKODH_TV**

* **LEXICON TSEAHKODH_IV**

* **LEXICON TSEAHKODH** row C - Group II    these have (lexicalized) diminutives on -estit, and passives on -algidh

* **LEXICON GUARKEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON GUARKEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON GUARKEDH** row B - Group III

Fått tilbakemelding på denne om at "jarkah" er +Ind+Prs+Sg2, og "Jarkh!" er +Imprt. Har forelöpig satt denne inn som Err/Orth

* **LEXICON SIJHTEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON TJOEHPEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON GALKEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON TJOEHPEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON TJOEHPEDH** row D - Group IV

* **LEXICON TJOEHPEDH_NOTVGEN**

* **LEXICON GALKEDH_CONT** row D - Group IV

* **LEXICON BIEGKEDH** row D - Group IV !impersonals

* **LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON SÅÅJHTEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON BÅÅHKEDH** row E - Group V

* **LEXICON SÅÅJHTEDH_CONT** row E - Group V

* **LEXICON VÅÅJNEDH**

* **LEXICON GÖÖLEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON GÖÖLEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON GÖÖLEDH** row F - Group VI

* **LEXICON BÖÖVTEDH** row F - Group VI

* **LEXICON EEREDH_TV**

* **LEXICON EEREDH_IV**

* **LEXICON ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON ÅARAJEHTEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON ÅARAJEHTEDH** row A - Group I

* **LEXICON BUARADEHTEDH**

* **LEXICON GOEGKERDADTEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON GOEGKERDADTEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON GOEGKERDADTEDH** row D - Group IV

* **LEXICON OBREDADTEDH**

* **LEXICON GÅETEDH_TV**

* **LEXICON GÅETEDH_IV**

* **LEXICON GÅETEDH** from Der/InchL

* **LEXICON STIEHPEGÅETEDH**

* **LEXICON AHTJE_TV**

* **LEXICON AHTJE_IV**

* **LEXICON OBRIJAHTJEDH**

* **LEXICON AHTJE** row D - Group IV

* **LEXICON SOVVEDH**row D - Group IV

* **LEXICON IV_PASSIVE_L** - Passive of intransitive verbs => impersonate verbs, like "dïjvelduvvieh" = "(de sakene) ble diskutert", from "dïjveldidh" = "diskutere" (IV), only used in 3rd person Sg and Pl.

Infinite forms
--------------
+V+IV+Act:%>eme       FINAL1        ;
+V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ije       FINAL1        ;
+V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ijes      FINAL1        ;
Derivations
-----------

* **LEXICON LGIDH**

Nominal derivation sublexica

* **LEXICON LAAHKOEH_ODD**

    - **LEXICON LAAHKOEH_ÅBPOE**

    - **LEXICON LAAHKOEH_OMMES**

* **LEXICON IGENSUFF**

## Verbal affixes

### Finite forms

#### Even

##### Present

* **LEXICON V-I-PRS-SG** Merge with V-EVEN-PRS if nothing special here.

* **LEXICON V-II-PRS-SG**

* **LEXICON V-III-PRS-SG**

* **LEXICON VSUF-V-EVEN-PRS**

* **LEXICON VSUF-V-EVEN-PRS-DUPL**

* **LEXICON VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL**

* **LEXICON VSUF-VI-EVEN-PRS**

* **LEXICON V-IV-EVEN-PRS**

##### Imperative

* **LEXICON VSUF-EVEN-IMP**

* **LEXICON VSUF-II-EVEN-IMP**

* **LEXICON VSUF-III-EVEN-IMP**

#### Ulikestavelsesverb - ODD

##### Present

* **LEXICON VSUF-ODD-PRS**

    - **LEXICON V-ODD-PRS-SG**

    - **LEXICON V-ODD-PRS-DUPL**

    - **LEXICON ODD_PRS_NON_DU3**

    - **LEXICON ODD_PRS_DU3**

##### Past

* **LEXICON VSUF-ODD-PRT**

##### Imperative

* **LEXICON VSUF-ODD-IMP**

#### Common even-odd

##### Present

* **LEXICON V-PRS-SG-12** Kutt denne viss ikkje ref til

* **LEXICON V-PRS-SG-1**

* **LEXICON V-PRS-SG-2**

* **LEXICON V-PRS-SG-3**

##### Past

* **LEXICON VSUF-PRT**

* **LEXICON VSUF-PRT-SG-12**

* **LEXICON VSUF-PRT-SG-3**

* **LEXICON VSUF-PRT-DUPL**

## Flag diacritica

LEXICON V-EVEN-PRS
V-PRS-SG-12 ;
V-PRS-SG-3 ;
V-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
